New York, session 2025-2026, A6384.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. To ensure the safety and security of 2 school communities, the appropriate supervision of staff and personnel, 3 and the proper management of school buildings, all schools must have 4 appropriate staffing, including administrators. To ensure the safety and 5 security of all students and school staff and personnel, the following 6 minimum staffing standards must be met. 7 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 2590-i of the education law is amended 8 by adding three new paragraphs (d), (e) and (f) to read as follows: 9 (d) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (d) of subdivision four of 10 section twenty-five hundred ninety-j of this article, each school shall 11 have appointed a minimum of one assistant principal. All assistant prin- 12 cipals shall maintain all appropriate certifications as required by 13 regulation. 14 (e) Assistant principals shall be responsible for the safe operation 15 of the school on occasions when the principal is not present. 16 (f) Assistant principals may be required by the chancellor or the 17 superintendent to provide or participate in training or other forms of 18 staff development or to address identified areas of educational need and 19 promote student achievement and school performance. 20 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2573 of the education 21 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph iii to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00536-05-6 A. 6384--A 2 1 iii. Notwithstanding subparagraphs i and ii of this paragraph, each 2 school shall appoint a minimum of one full-time assistant principal. All 3 assistant principals shall maintain all appropriate certifications as 4 required by regulation. Assistant principals shall be responsible for 5 the safe operation of the school on occasions when the principal is not 6 present. Assistant principals may be required by the chancellor or the 7 superintendent to provide or participate in training or other forms of 8 staff development or to address identified areas of educational need and 9 promote student achievement and school performance. 10 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 11 the date on which it shall have become a law; provided however that the 12 amendments to section 2590-i of the education law made by section two of 13 this act shall survive the expiration and reversion of such section as 14 provided in section 17 of chapter 345 of the laws of 2009, as amended.